pt-BR: Medição de temperatura: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Outro
fr: Mesure de température: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Autre
hr-HR: Temperaturna ljestvica: Celzij (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Ostalo
de: Temperaturmessung: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Sonstiges
nb: Temperaturmåling: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Annet
hu: Hőmérsékletmérés: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Egyéb
zh-TW: 溫度測量: 攝氏 (°C); 華氏 (°F); 其他
sk-SK: Meranie teploty: Celzia (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Iné
ru: Измерение температуры: Градусы Цельсия (°С); Градусы Фаренгейта (°F); Другое
zh-CN: 温度测量: 摄氏度 (°C); 华氏度 (°F); 其他
cs: Měření teploty: Stupně Celsia (°C); Stupně Fahrenheita (°F); Jiné
ro-RO: Măsurarea temperaturii: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Altele
ja: 測定温度単位: 摂氏 (°C); 華氏 (°F); その他
lt-LT: Temperatūros matavimas: Celsijus (°C); Farenheitas (°F); Kita
ko: 온도 측정: 섭씨(°C); 화씨(°F); 기타
it: Misurazione della temperatura: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Altro
tr: Sıcaklık ölçümü: Santigrat (°C); Fahrenhayt (°F); Diğer
bg-BG: Измерване на температура: Целзий (°C); Фаренхайт (°F); Други
el: Μέτρηση θερμοκρασίας: Κελσίου (°C); Φαρενάιτ (°F); Άλλο
en: Temperature measurement: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Other
vi: Đo nhiệt độ: Độ Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Khác
da: Temperaturmåling: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Andet
th: การวัดอุณหภูมิ: เซลเซียส (°C); ฟาเรนไฮต์ (°F); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Merjenje temperature: Celzija (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Drugo
sv: Temperaturmätning: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Övrigt
pl: Pomiar temperatury: Celsjusza (°C); Fahrenheita (°F); Inne
pt-PT: Medição de temperatura: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Outro
es: Medición de temperatura: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Otros
nl: Temperatuurmeting: Celsius (°C); Fahrenheit (°F); Andere
fi: Lämpötilan mittaus: Celsiusastetta (°C); Fahrenheit-astetta (°F); Muu